Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2036.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 16, chapter 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 1.2, to read: ARTICLE 1.2. SAME DAY VOTER REGISTRATION START_STATUTE16-115. Registration on election day and preceding twenty-eight days; provisional ballot; qualifying elections A. Notwithstanding any other law and except as provided in subsection B of this section: 1. A person who is otherwise qualified to register to vote may register to vote during the twenty-eight days immediately preceding an election and is eligible to vote in that election if the person has been a resident of the county and the precinct in which the person resides for at least twenty-nine days immediately preceding the election, and The person completes a registration form as provided in section 16-152. 2. A person who is otherwise qualified to register to vote may register to vote on election day by appearing at the polling place for the precinct in which that person maintains the person's residence, completing a registration form as provided in section 16-152 and providing proof of residence. 3. A person who registers to vote pursuant to this section may vote on election day or in the twenty-eight days immediately preceding that election only with a provisional ballot as prescribed in section 16-584 and may vote as otherwise provided by law for any election held at least twenty-nine days after the election day for which the person registered. B. Registration pursuant to this section qualifies the person to vote only for candidates for federal offices, including presidential electors, statewide and countywide offices and the legislature but does not qualify a person to vote in a partisan primary election. C. The secretary of state and county officers in charge of elections shall promptly implement this article. END_STATUTE